src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"tTod"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 t:d <=>
 Vow _ s (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
         Vow _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|(HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: (%>) :Vow ] ;
!! kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: 
!!€ kaota%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ kaoda0

!2015-09-02 Vow [(%^StrGStem:| CnsInZero: %^WGStem:) (%>) Vow | Vow (%^WGStem:)] %> _ [%> | # | :Vow ] ;
!! There should always be a trigger



" %{dn%}:d"
!! __@RULENAME@__
  %{dn%}:d <=> n _ Vow: (l) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: %^StrGStem:  ;

!!€ kan%{dn%}õl%{back%}%^Pen%^G2%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kand0l0000%>õ

 n _  (HarmDummies:) VOWHite %^StrGStem: ;

"j2i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 j:i <=> :Vow (HarmDummies:) %> _ [ # | %- ];

"{kḱg}:g "
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{kḱg%}:g <=> _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite [%^WGStem: | %^G1: ] ;

!! kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Gen
!!€ kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}
!!€ kõi0g00%>õ


"k2g"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 k:g <=> [Vow|Cns - [h|k|s]] _ [(HarmDummies:)|Vow Cns:+ (HarmDummies:)  %^Pen: ] %^G1: ;
!!€ hõrak%^G1%>a
!!€ hõrag0%>a
!!$ hõrak%^G1%>a
!!$ hõrak0%>a
!!€ kisk%^G1%>%{uü%}%>t%{aä%}v
!!€ kis0%>u%>tav

!!€ süküs%^Pen%^WGStem%>e
!!€ sügüs0%>e



"gTok"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 g:k <=>
    Vow _ (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem:  ; 
    Vow _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] ( l | r ) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
    Vow _ Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem: ;
!FIX-ME 2019-05-8    Vow 0: _ (HarmDummies:|[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!€ ig0ä%^XStrGStem
!!€ ikkä0
   Vow _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] [ l | r ] (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem: %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!!€ kogõr%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ
!!€ kok0r00%>õ
   [t ] (VowInZero:) (HarmDummies:) (%^VowRM:) %> _ u ;

"bTop"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 b:p <=> 
    Vow _ Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^StrGStem: ;
!FIX-ME 2019-05-8     Vow _ 0: Vow: (HarmDummies:) %^XStrGStem: ;

"%{pbv%}:p"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{pbv%}:p <=>
   Vow: %{Øp%}: _ (HarmDummies:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ tõ%{Øp%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^XStrGStem%>%{eõ%}
!!€ tõpp00%>e


"%{pbØ%}:p"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{pbØ%}:p <=> 
    Vow ( %{Øp%}: ) _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
    Vow %{Øp%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^XStrGStem: ;
    %{pØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [ %^G3: | %^G4: ] ; 

"%{tdØ%}:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{tdØ%}:t <=>
  Vow ( %{Øt%}: ) _ (s) [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
  Vow ( %{Øt%}: ) _ (s) (HarmDummies:) VOWHite [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
    Vow %{Øt%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^G4:|%^G3:] ;
    %{tØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:)  %^Pen: [%^G3: | %^G4: ];

"%{kgØ%}:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{kgØ%}:k <=>
  Vow ( %{Øk%}: ) _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) VOWHite %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) VOWHite ] %^StrGStem: ;
    Vow %{Øk%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^XStrGStem: ;
   Vow: %{Øk%}: _ (HarmDummies:) %^XStrGStem: ;
!!mägi+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ mä%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^XStrGStem%>%{eõ%}
!!€ mäkk00%>e
    %{kØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:)  %^Pen: [%^G3: | %^G4: ];

!! !STEM-FINAL CONSONANT LOSS
"s20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 s:0 <=> [ u: | ü: | a: | ä: ] _ (HarmDummies:) (%^VowRM:)  %^WGStem:  ;
         s _ %^TS2S: ;
!! usś+N+Sg+Par __door__
!!€ uss%^TS2S%>t
!!€ us00%>t

  s _ (HarmDummies:) [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!FIXME 2019-05-08  s _  [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: [%^CC2C:0|%^WGStem:] ;
!FIXME
!!€ vassi%{back%}%^CC2C%^I2%^PAL%>m%{aä%}
!!€ vaś00000%>ma

"%{bv%}:b"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{bv%}:b <=> 
   [ r| l | n | i] _ [ Vow: | ArchVow: ] ( ArchCns: | ArchCns: Cns ) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite  %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!! närväs+A+Sg+Gen:
!!€ när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem
!!€ närbä000000
  Vow [ r| l | n | i] _  (HarmDummies:)  [ %^G4: | %^G3: | %^G2: |%^StrGStem:]  ;

"%{gØ%}:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{gØ%}:g <=> 
    _ (HarmDummies:) VOWHite %^StrGStem: ;
!! liig+A+Sg+Nom:
!!€ lii%{gØ%}%{back%}%^StrGStem
!!€ liig00
    _ Vow: (:Cns+|ArchCns:) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^StrGStem: ;
!! huug

  Vow [ r| l | n ] _  (HarmDummies:)  [ %^G4: | %^G3: | %^G2: |%^StrGStem:]  ;

"d20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 d:0 <=>
         Vow _ s ([Vow:|ArchVow:]) (HarmDummies:) %^TS2S: ;
!!€ hüdsi%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te
!!€ hü0s000%>te
!2019-06-02          Vow: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;

"%{dØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{dØ%}:0 <=>
          _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (ArchCns: |Cns:+|:Cns+ ) (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;


"g20"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 g:0 <=> [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:]  _ (HarmDummies:)  %^WGStem: ;
!!€ särg%^WGStem%>#
!!€ sär0e0%>0
!!€ aig%^WGStem%>o
!!€ a000%>o
   [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:] _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:)|(HarmDummies:) %{eõ%}:] PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ igä%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ i0ä00
!! lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc __read/lukea__
!!€ lugõ%^Pen%^WGStem%^Õ2E%>t
!!€ lo0e000%>t
!! argnõma+V+Inf
!!€ arg%{back%}%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStemd%{aä%}q
!!€ ar00õ00daq

"%{gØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{gØ%}:0 <=> [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:]  _ (HarmDummies:)  %^WGStem: ;
!!€ sär%{gØ%}%^WGStem%>e
!!€ sär00%>e
!!€ aig%^WGStem%>o
!!€ a000%>o
   [Cns: - [n:]|Vow:] _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:|ArchCns:) (HarmDummies:)|(HarmDummies:) %{eõ%}:] PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ i%{kgØ%}ä%^Pen%^WGStem
!!€ i0ä00
!! lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc __read/lukea__
!!€ lu%{kgØ%}õ%^Pen%^WGStem%^Õ2E%>t
!!€ lo0e000%>t
!! argnõma+V+Inf
!!€ arg%{back%}%{eõ%}%^Pen%^WGStemd%{aä%}q
!!€ ar00õ00daq


!2017-02-03 Vow l _ Vow (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ palgõ%^WGStem%>h
!!€ pal0õ0%>h

"%{pbv%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{pbv%}:v <=> 
   Vow: %{pØ%}: _ (HarmDummies:) %^G1: ;
   Vow: %{Øp%}: _ (HarmDummies:) %^WGStem: ;
!!tõbi+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}
!!€ tõ0v00%>õ


"%{pbØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{pbØ%}:0 <=>
     %{pØ%}: _ Vow  (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1: ;
! Vow ( %{Øp%}: ) _ Vow  (HarmDummies:) [PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^WGStem:|%^G1:] ;
 

"%{tdØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{tdØ%}:0 <=>
         Vow _ s [ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) PenVOWHite %^Pen:| (HarmDummies:) VOWHite] %^G1:  ;
!!€ hüdsi%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te
!!€ hü0s000%>te
          Vow: _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) (PenVOWHite|VOWHite) %^Pen:|(HarmDummies:) VOWHite ] %^G1: ;


"%{kgØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{kgØ%}:0 <=> 
   Vow: _ [[Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) ((%^Pen:) %^VOWLower:) %^Pen:| (HarmDummies:) VOWHite ] %^WGStem: ;
    Vow: %{Øk%}: _ (HarmDummies:) %^G1: ;
!!jõgi+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ jõ%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{eõ%}
!!€ jõ0000%>õ

   %{kØ%}: _ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (HarmDummies:) ((%^Pen:) %^VOWLower:) %^Pen: %^G1: ;

!!€ u%{jØ%}jo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>m%{aä%}
!!€ u0jo000%>ma


"Disallow %^ErrorBack:0 in BHARM"
%^ErrorBack: /<= BHARM _ ;





!!TESTS
!echo 'v a s t a l i {back}:0 > n {eõ}:õ' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/vro-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'vallalinõ+A+Sg+Nom' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst

!OLD


!! püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%{front%}%^PAL
!!€ püüd́00


!! pereq
!!€ pe%{rØ%}re%^WGStem%>h
!!€ pe0re0%>h

!! naŕma
!!€ na%{rØ%}%{rŕ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL%>m%{aä%}
!!€ na0r000%>ma


!! !Other marks
!FIXME
!!€ ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}%>a
!!€ kipõn%>a

!"mToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! m:0 <=> m_ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;

!"vToZero"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! v:0 <=> v_ [Vow:|ArchVow:] (Cns:* |i:) (HarmDummies:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
